also a small correction: the guy WaPo cites in their article, Cliff Kincaid, is not a good source. He writes a lot of racist and conspiracy theory stuff that ends up on Russian fake news sites:


&nbsp;

http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	An Initial Set of Sites That Reliably Echo Russian Propaganda

	...amren.com... 


https://www.amren.com/news/2006/08/black_gangs_ter/
	Black Gangs Terrorize D.C.

	Cliff Kincaid, Accuracy In Media, August 11, 2006

	...Over at the Post, whose chairman Donald Graham is a former D.C. police officer, ombudsman Deborah Howell defended the paper’s policy of not reporting the racial characteristics of alleged criminals. While the Post did publish a photo of the alleged killers in the Sennit murder, she wrote, “The curiosity of readers about race is understandable, but, practically, what help is it to know that a suspect was black or mixed-race or a whiter shade of pale if there aren’t enough details to be able to identify a suspect and call the police? Or if it’s not pertinent to the crime. Will knowing the color of a person’s skin make you feel any safer?”

	Howell is not a true “reader advocate.” She is an apologist for a politically correct policy at the paper that could cost lives. Maybe she’ll change her mind when she’s mugged.


https://www.amren.com/news/2012/05/obama-stimulus-money-for-video-games-and-racial-studies/
	Obama Stimulus Money for Video Games and Racial Studies

	Cliff Kincaid, Accuracy in Media, May 25, 2012

	...Obama ally who allegedly offered a $150,000 bribe to Obama pastor Jeremiah Wright to be quiet until after the 2008 election...


https://www.amren.com/news/2010/05/arizona_ethnic_1/
	Arizona Ethnic Studies Exposed

	Cliff Kincaid, Accuracy in Academia, May 24, 2010

	...Occupied America, the fifth edition, {snip} refers to white people as “gringos” and actually includes a quotation on page 323 from Jose Angel Gutierrez of the Mexican American Youth Organization (MAYO), who was angry over the cancellation of a government program. He declared:

	“We are fed up. We are going to move to do away with the injustice to the Chicano and if the ‘gringo’ doesn’t get out of our way, we will stampede over him.”


https://www.amren.com/news/2011/01/fox_news_report/
	American Renaissance

	Fox News Report Blaming Right for Shootings Officially Debunked

	Cliff Kincaid, Accuracy in Media, January 12, 2011

	An alleged Department of Homeland Security memo saying that Arizona shooter Jared Loughner was influenced by American Renaissance (AR), a controversial conservative publication, does not exist and there is no evidence of such a tie...


&nbsp;


His schtick is that he writes a lot about how Russians/communists are "subverting America" and attacks people for working for the Russians (he's accused both pat Buchanan and Alex Jones of being "Russian dupes"), but does a really bad job at it:


&nbsp;



http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	An Initial Set of Sites That Reliably Echo Russian Propaganda

	...beforeitsnews.com...newswithviews.com...freedomoutpost.com...americasfreedomfighters.com



http://www.newswithviews.com/Kincaid/cliff967.htm
	THE RE-EDUCATION BRAINWASHING CAMPS WE CALL UNIVERSITIES

	By Cliff Kincaid

	...The taxpayers who pay the bill for these Marxist re-education camps we call colleges and universities have to revolt against the socialism that rules higher education in America. Sanders wants to perpetuate that mind-set because he knows that, under the guidance of faculty from sociology, women’s and queer studies, students are being mind-controlled and groomed for jobs that don’t exist. Hence, they become more cannon-fodder for the revolution.


http://canadafreepress.com/article/queer-communism-finds-its-voice
	News media in bed with the homosexual and transgender movements
	“Queer Communism” Finds its Voice

	By Cliff Kincaid 


http://www.aim.org/aim-column/cnns-iranian-propaganda-campaign/	
	CNN’s Iranian Propaganda Campaign 

	by Cliff Kincaid

	Even before CNN falsely claimed that Iranian President Rouhani had denounced the Holocaust by name during his interview with Christiane Amanpour, Fareed Zakaria was peddling the notion that the Ayatollah of Iran, Ali Khamenei, was an intellectual. In reality, the evidence suggests he is a Russian agent trained by the KGB whose ultimate goal is to get United Nations help in disarming Israel.

	...What the article leaves out is the fact that Ali Khamenei was “educated” at the KGB’s Patrice Lumumba University in Moscow, along with the international terrorist “Carlos,” a convert to Islam and to the cause of al-Qaeda.

	...But CNN, which has increasingly emerged as an international “news” agency serving as a mouthpiece for the Iranian regime


http://canadafreepress.com/article/why-the-russians-conceived-the-global-warming-scam
	Why the Russians Conceived the Global Warming Scam

	By Cliff Kincaid

	...Their hypocrisy is further demonstrated by the abundant evidence that the global warming or climate change theory, which they now embrace, was conceived by Soviet communists as a means by which to destroy the industrial base in the United States. This disinformation theme has been embraced by the liberals now claiming to be tough on Russia.


http://beforeitsnews.com/opinion-conservative/2017/02/why-the-cia-wants-to-destroy-flynn-3249396.html
	Why the CIA Wants to Destroy Flynn

	By Cliff Kincaid  /  AIM.org

	The media have figured out they can’t bring down or impeach President Trump. So they are targeting his Cabinet officials and top advisers one by one. In the case of Michael T. Flynn, the media think they have hit pay dirt. The Washington Post has led the charge, using top-secret surveillance intercepts of communications between Flynn and the Russian Ambassador to the U.S. It’s more evidence that the CIA, and perhaps the National Security Agency (NSA), are out to destroy Trump’s national security adviser.

	...As CIA director, Brennan told a congressional forum that even voting communist, as he once did, was not a bar to employment at the agency. 

	...In his new book, iWar: War and Peace in the Information Age, Bill Gertz explains how the CIA has become “politicized,” dominated by a “liberal culture,” and resistant to probes of communist moles within.


http://beforeitsnews.com/tea-party/2011/12/kincaid-gingrich-charge-of-a-socialist-america-confirmed-1481993.html
	Kincaid: Gingrich Charge of a Socialist America Confirmed

	By Cliff Kincaid

	...They have always looked for an opening to advance their un-American ideas on American soil. Over the last three years, Obama has been their vehicle in the White House.

	The problem for Nichols is that, despite his own openness about wanting to be part of Obama’s socialist transformation of America...


http://canadafreepress.com/article/just-who-was-the-russian-agent-after-all
	Just Who Was the Russian Agent After All?

	By Cliff Kincaid

	Ever since President Trump’s missile strike on Syria on April 6, which angered Russia’s Vladimir Putin, The Washington Post has ever-so-subtly backed away from its robotic “Russian interference to help elect Trump” claims, asserted with absolute certainty. The Post now, on April 7, calls it the “alleged” Russian efforts to “interfere in the 2016 presidential race.” The Post no longer sounds so sure of itself and its anonymous anti-Trump intelligence agency sources.

	The U.S. strike on a Syrian air base not only demonstrates that Trump will take decisive action against a Russian client state, but that his predecessor, President Barack Obama, is the real Russian dupe


https://freedomoutpost.com/obama-his-marxist-communist-past-exposed/
	Obama: His Marxist / Communist Past Exposed & How It Continues

	...In this very good article by Cliff Kincaid, Mr. Kincaid quotes yet another man whom had an impact upon Obama and he revealed what may well be showing up before us as a true Communist mole by the name of Obama!


https://www.americasfreedomfighters.com/2015/04/14/bombshell-obama-video-telling-people-exactly-who-he-is-mysteriously-surfaces/
	America's Freedom Fighters
	Real News From Real Patriots
	
	BOMBSHELL: Obama Video Telling People Exactly Who He Is Mysteriously Surfaces…

	Cliff Kincaid / Accuracy in Media

	...Davis was indeed a black poet. His works included attacks on Christianity. One Davis poem referred to Christ irreverently as a “nigger.” Davis was himself an atheist.

	However, Davis was better known as a communist propagandist whose work for the Communist Party in Hawaii earned him surveillance by the FBI and placement on its “security index.” Davis was also a pornographer who engaged in bizarre sexual practices, even pedophilia.

	Needless to say, Obama’s willingness to identify “Frank” as Davis before this audience raises questions as to why “Frank” wasn’t identified by his full name—Frank Marshall Davis—in the book itself. Obama made references to “Frank” 22 times throughout his book. Paul Kengor notes that Obama’s audio version of Dreams from My Father omitted every reference to “Frank” that was in the book. Those omissions were clearly designed to keep people from asking questions about “Frank,” since Obama was considering a run for the presidency.


&nbsp;


Some of Kincaid's associates have the same schtick, notably Konstantin Preobrazhensky (who wrote the book "Back from the Dead: The Return of the Evil Empire" with Kincaid), who writes outlandish accusations of Russian intelligence in ways that make them hard to believe:


&nbsp;


http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-news/2347604/posts
	Lt. Col. Konstantin Preobrazhensky
 
	...Mohammed Atta, the pilot of the first plane to crash into the World Trade Center on September 11, 2001, had met with a senior Iraqi intelligence agent in Prague, Czech Republic, five months before the attack. But Iraqi intelligence was just a client of Russia's intelligence service. It brings a new understanding to the fact that President Putin was the first foreign President to call President Bush on 9/11. One may conjecture that he knew in advance what was to happen.


http://www.leninandsharia.com/docs/preobrazhensky.pdf
	Communists and Muslims: The Hidden Hand of the KGB

	By Konstantin Preobrazhensky

	Introduction

	By Cliff Kincaid

	I am pleased to present Konstantin Preobrazhensky’s insightful treatment of the radical Muslim problem, in connection with how the communists, in particular the Russians, are using or exploiting them.

	...In this report, he discusses a peculiar phenomenon – those with Muslim names and communist hearts. Or, as Frank Gaffney has put it, Sharia is “Communism with a God.” This seemingly paradoxical problem is real and has been exported by the Soviet Union as part of the communist world revolution.

	...We believe the House Committee on Homeland Security, chaired by Rep. Peter King, should hold hearings on these matters...


http://www.breitbart.com/video/2017/10/29/rep-peter-king-not-one-word-evidence-linking-trump-campaign-russian-collusion/
	Rep Peter King: ‘Not One Word of Evidence’ Linking Trump Campaign to Russian Collusion


http://www.leninandsharia.com/docs/preobrazhensky.pdf
	...A new committee or subcommittee -- specifically designed to probe Marxist organizations -- needs to be established as well.

	...**The core question we are raising in this report: are the Islamists in many cases communists with Islamic masks?**


	...Communists and Muslims: The Hidden Hand of the KGB

	By Konstantin Preobrazhensky

	The communists have considered Islam their ally from the very beginning, because in the early 20th century, Islam was the religion of the “oppressed people.”


https://archive.org/stream/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld/The%20World%20Was%20Going%20Our%20Way_djvu.txt
	...In reality, Soviet persecution during the generation which followed the Bolshevik Revolution was far worse than anything endured by the Muslim subjects of the later Tsarist Empire. Islam was condemned as a relic of the feudal era which had no place in a society of ‘advanced socialism’ and was therefore ‘doomed to disappear’. 

	During the Great Patriotic War Stalin saw all Soviet Muslims, like the Volga Germans, as actual or potential traitors. The Muslim peoples whose territory had been invaded by the German army (Karachai, Kalmyks, Balkars and Crimean Tatars) as well as the Chechens and Ingush, whose republic had barely been reached by the Wehrmacht, were deported by the NKVD to Siberia and central Asia, mostly during 1943-44, in horrific conditions. One of the Balkar deportees later recalled, ‘They only gave us fifteen minutes to gather a few belongings and we didn’t even know what was going on. It was only when they put us in the train wagons that we realized we were going far away.’ Though hundreds of thousands died from starvation and cold during the deportation and in the ‘special settlements’ in which they were dumped, Beria declared the whole operation a complete success and promoted a decree by the Supreme Soviet ‘on decorations and medals for the most outstanding [NKVD] participants’. There was no word of official criticism until Khrushchev’s ‘Secret Speech’ to the Twentieth Party Congress in 1956 denounced the deportations as ‘crude violations of the basic Leninist principles of the nationality policies of the Soviet State’. Over the next few years most of the surviving deportees, except for the Crimean Tatars and Volga Germans, were allowed to return to their homelands. They found their houses occupied, most mosques demolished and many family gravestones ripped up for use as building materials.

	...One of the former deportees described seeing his bewildered mother with a baby in her arms kicked out of her house in 1944 by a Russian officer. In exile in Kazakhstan the ground had been so hard that it was difficult to dig graves for the families who died of cold and starvation. ‘I am glad’, the speaker concluded, ‘that I saw this with my own eyes so that my anger will never fade away.’

	...A hundred or so KGB agents were sent to mingle with the crowd and persuade them to leave. Some did, but the majority remained. Fire engines then drenched the crowd with freezing water from their hoses, and a combination of soldiers, KGB units and militiamen drove most of the demonstrators from the square.

	...Based on intelligence from the illegals and other sections of the KGB, Andropov made a preliminary report to the Politburo in April 1973 on the reasons for the January unrest. He paid a grudging tribute to the efficiency with which the protests had been organized. The discipline and secrecy preserved beforehand by thousands of demonstrators had meant that no advance warning had reached the authorities. Andropov acknowledged frankly that the influence of the official Islamic directorate of the northern Caucasus was ‘minimal’: ‘As there are no official mosques, religious ceremonies are carried out secretly by believers.’ Real influence lay with the unauthorized mullahs who ‘do not stop believers joining the Party or the Komsomol as long as they remain true to the teachings of Islam. This they do.’ 

	...The KGB believed that disciplined and secretive Sufi brotherhoods were present in every town, street and village of Chechnya-Ingushetiya. The only authority which the people respected was that of the religious elders. Disputes were settled in Islamic courts and Soviet law ignored.

	...The KGB reported one occasion on which 40,000 pilgrims gathered at the tomb of the Sufi saint Hay Imam in Azerbaijan. Even the destruction of religious monuments did not always deter the pilgrims. When the Uzbek authorities blew up the holy rock at Parpiata, the Muslim faithful constructed a pyramid from the remains, which they continued to venerate.


http://www.leninandsharia.com/docs/preobrazhensky.pdf
	...Muslims have heard Lenin's call. ...Both Soviet and Imperial Russia have always enjoyed the Muslim’s support.

	...Yasser Arafat also was a KGB agent, ant all his Palestinian terrorists were closely connected to the Soviet Union. Many of them studied at the KGB schools of terrorists.

	There has always been a link between Communist and Islamic terrorism.

	...The late Alexander Litvinenko, poisoned in London in November 2006, told me that his former FSB colleagues had trained famous al-Qaeda terrorists Ayman Al-Zawahiri and Juma Namangoniy during the 1990s and 1980s. Ayman Al-Zawahiri, one of the world’s most wanted terrorists, has been responsible for the murder of U.S. nationals outside the United States. Before his death, Juma Namangoniy (Jumabai Hojiyev), a native of Soviet Uzbekistan, was a right-hand man of Osama bin Laden in charge of the Taliban’s northern front in Afghanistan.

	Juma Namangoniy was once a student of the Saboteur Training Center of the First Chief Directorate of the KGB in 1989-91.

	Alexander Litvinenko also told me that famous General Dostum, a former government army general during the Soviet war in Afghanistan, was a KGB agent, too.


&nbsp;


By credible sources (e.g. https://archive.org/stream/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld/The%20World%20Was%20Going%20Our%20Way_djvu.txt
), some of Preobrazhensky's claims are actually true, but you wouldn't get that impression if you heard them from Preobrazhensky first. This effect might be even stronger with Kincaid, who seems to end up making people skeptical of anything he comes off as passionate about and sympathetic to anyone he attacks. Even Russia Today has noticed this:


&nbsp;


https://www.rt.com/op-edge/319507-cliff-kincaid-us-media/
	America's Survival: Is Accuracy In Media damaging the cause it purports to represent?

	It is customary for RT’s most enthusiastic critics to at least feign a veneer of objectivity. Even when foaming at the mouth to land a blow, they’ll dress it up as concern for something or other. Then there’s Cliff Kincaid. Kincaid doesn’t bother with such niceties.

	Kincaid is a regular guest on mainstream media, boasting appearances on the likes of Fox, CBS and CNN. Indeed, he's a former guest co-host of the latter's Crossfire. Kincaid is also a director at Accuracy in Media, an influential press watchdog, which when you break it down, essentially specializes in smears posing as serious analysis.



&nbsp;


Maybe unsurprisingly then, Kincaid often appears as a foil in more mainstream media (like in the above mentioned WaPo article):


&nbsp;


http://www.nytimes.com/1983/03/29/science/education-curriculum-addresses-fear-of-atom-war.html
	EDUCATION; CURRICULUM ADDRESSES FEAR OF ATOM WAR

	March 29, 1983

	...What remains to be seen, however, is whether educators and parents see the unit as a balanced treatment or as propaganda intended to win the young for the cause of nuclear disarmament.

	Behind the unit's development are two organizations, the Union of Concerned Scientists and the National Education Association, both of which have taken firm stands in favor of a freeze on nuclear weapons.

	...But the curriculum unit could turn out to be highly controversial, coming as it does when Reagan Administration has portrayed advocates of a nuclear freeze as working against the national interest.

	Conservative Objections

	Human Events, a national conservative weekly published in Washington, has denounced the curriculum and impugned the intentions of the sponsors. Cliff Kincaid, an associate editor of Human Events, said ''It seemed designed to create a new generation of antinuclear activists.''

	Mr. Kincaid charged that among the dozens of resources cited in the curriculum guide for further study, ''not one could be regarded as solidly prodefense and almost are intricately bound up with the peace movement.''


https://www.politico.com/story/2009/03/group-puts-ayers-back-in-spotlight-019950
	Group puts Ayers back in spotlight

	Apparently we've not heard the last of Bill Ayers.

	Ayers is the University of Illinois at Chicago professor who, back in the 1960s, co-founded the radical leftist Weather Underground and who became a lightning rod during the 2008 presidential campaign when questions were raised about his associations with Barack Obama.

	On Thursday, representatives from "The Campaign for Justice for Victims of Weather Underground Terrorism" held a press conference at the National Press Club in Washington to urge an expanded probe of Ayers and his wife, Bernadine Dohrn, who was also a member of the Weather Underground.

	"Don't we care that the young people today are exposed to the communist rantings of a Charles Manson follower?" asked Cliff Kincaid, who's best known as editor of the conservative media watch dog group Accuracy in the Media.

	...Since the 2008 campaign, Kincaid said that Ayers and Dohrn have been "reminiscing on their days as terrorists and expressing hope that America is at the dawn of a new progressive era.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/dana-milbank-romneys-encouragement-of-the-obama-conspiracies/2012/07/20/gJQAlFXWyW_story.html
	Dana Milbank: Romney’s encouragement of the Obama conspiracies

	...Sununu, like other prominent Republicans, is winking at those conservatives who continue to make the claim, often race-based, that President Obama is something un-American, something “other” than the rest of us. On Thursday, two days after Sununu’s attack, Romney himself said that Obama lacks “an understanding of what it is that makes America such a unique nation.”

	Sununu and Romney are legitimizing people such as Cliff Kincaid.



&nbsp;


Journalist Jesse Walker might have realized Kincaid's usefulness as a foil to argue the opposite of whatever Kincaid says, although Walker probably took it to far when he tried to paint the idea that the Kremlin has influence over Trump as a conspiracy theory made up by Kincaid:


&nbsp;


https://www.washingtonpost.com/posteverything/wp/2016/08/12/sure-trump-loves-conspiracy-theories-so-do-his-foes/
	Sure, Trump loves conspiracy theories. So do his foes.

	By Jesse Walker

	...But the biggest Trump conspiracy stories are the ones that call the candidate a tentacle of the Kremlin. Half a year ago, this idea was largely limited to the fringes, where it was flogged by folks like Cliff Kincaid, a conservative gadfly who posed such queries as “Is Trump a sleeper agent for Moscow?” The idea started percolating into the mainstream media over the summer. It picked up steam after WikiLeaks’ release of the Democratic National Committee’s emails, a data dump many blamed on Russian hackers.


&nbsp;


This is significant, since Walker sounds like a Russian propagandist:


&nbsp;



http://www.latimes.com/opinion/op-ed/la-oe-walker-russia-octopus-spaghetti-20170324-story.html
	Op-Ed Is the Trump-Russia story an octopus or spaghetti?

	By Jesse Walker

	How do you tell a plausible charge from a fevered fantasy? As allegations drip, drip about President Trump’s purported ties with Russia...


http://reason.com/blog/2017/01/03/the-other-way-the-debate-about-russian-h
	The Other Way the Debate About Russian Hacking is Like the Debate About WMDs
	Don't be distracted into debating the wrong things.

	Jesse Walker

	...Now, if Putin was working to help Trump become president—or even just to spread doubt about American electoral integrity—that's certainly worthy of note. But in terms of its actual impact, that would basically mean he was among the many forces spreading oppo over the course of the campaign. I'd be hard pressed to name a presidential election where various groups didn't publicize embarrassing information. Releasing the DNC emails wouldn't even be the most egregious way the Russians have messed with our information ecosystem. The Kremlin is known to spread actual disinformation, as in stories that aren't true. That seems more destructive than releasing authentic documents, but it doesn't have that spooky word "hacking" attached to it, so I guess it's harder to work people up into a fever about it.

	Needless to say, it's hard to name a recent presidential campaign that didn't contain any disinformation either. Even here, Putin's electoral "interference" amounted to being one of the goons spraying signals into the ether.


http://reason.com/blog/2014/03/06/4-concepts-about-the-ukraine-crisis-that
	4 Concepts About the Ukraine Crisis That Shouldn't Be So Hard to Understand

	Jesse Walker

	...4. It is possible to believe it's bad that Russia's sticking its snout into its neighbor's affairs and that it would be dumb for the U.S. to intervene to stop it.

	Disagree with any of those combinations of views that you want. But don't act as though they're inconceivable. There have been a lot of logical leaps in the debates over the ongoing crisis, particularly—and most dangerously—from the folks who don't seem able to understand #4.



http://reason.com/blog/2017/11/02/search-for-foreign-subversives
	The Never-Ending Search for Foreign Subversives
	Stop scapegoating Russia for America's divisions—and stop using Moscow as an excuse to call for restrictions on speech.

	Jesse Walker


http://reason.com/blog/2011/02/11/communist-tract-of-the-day
	Communist Tract of the Day

	Jesse Walker

	...Franklin also pushes back against "the orthodox U.S. view of the purge trials"

	...There's much more, including a novel defense of the Hitler-Stalin pact


&nbsp;


And as those who study them know, these propagandists always like an easy fight. Why argue with someone who knows you're full of shit when you can argue with someone who makes you look "reasonable?" Kincaid, it seems, is happy to provide that service to those who disagree with him.


&nbsp;


Anyway, I've read more of Davis' writings and his FBI file and it does look like he was recruited by Soviet intelligence (and you don't need Kincaid and others like him to tell you that). Here is part of what I wrote down awhile ago:


------------


Russian intelligence recruits a lot of people, but they are especially concerned, even obsessed, with recruiting the people with the most potential for their purposes--people who simultaneously possess great talent and great weakness, whom they hoped to mold, influence, and promote to positions of power:


https://www.usnews.com/news/articles/2009/07/17/declassified-documents-reveal-kgb-spies-in-the-us
	...newly released documents from U.S. and Soviet archives show that hundreds of people, from the famous to the obscure, crossed paths with Soviet intelligence during the pre-World War II years. They include the country's most famous physicist, Robert Oppenheimer, novelist Ernest Hemingway, and civil servants like Hiss.


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/einsteins-letters-show-affair-with-spy-1162418.html
	Einstein's letters show affair with spy

	...According to Special Tasks, Konenkova was supposed to "influence Oppenheimer and other prominent American scientists who she met at Princeton". Princeton University was home at the time to Einstein. It is known that she succeeded in introducing Einstein to the Soviet consul in New York.


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.


Philby's life is a good example of how Russian intelligence tries to groom potential agents from a young age. Philby was [first introduced](https://books.google.com/books?id=i8ZPDqB_Ny0C&pg=PA47
) to socialist ideas no later than preparatory school, before being encouraged to devote himself to the communist cause by one of his [professors](http://spartacus-educational.com/Maurice_Dobb.htm) at Cambridge University. The professor's recommendations brought Philby to meet his first wife, herself an NKVD agent. Philby's wife encouraged him to work for the Soviets, and later arranged for him to meet other NKVD agents who would enlist Philby to spy for them more formally.

Philby's [father](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/1414561/Philbys-father-seen-as-threat.html), himself a socialist, did not discourage his son's communism, and later recommended him to the deputy chief of MI6. Philby would spend much of his career at MI6, eventually rising to head of counterespionage operations there.

Philby's second wife, said to be vulnerable but loyal and caring, died under suspicious circumstances, a tragedy that some [writers](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2016/04/04/kim-philby-was-a-bad-liar-his-true-talent-lay-in-self-mythology/
) insinuate was carried-out by Philby himself. Philby's fourth wife, with whom he spent his final days after defecting to Moscow, [alleged](https://www.theguardian.com/world/2011/mar/31/spy-kim-philby-disillusioned-communism
) that Philby was suicidal in the days leading up to his controversial death on May 11, 1988.

Philby's greatest strength might also have been his greatest weakness: Philby knew his charm and wit could ingratiate himself with anybody he crossed paths with, even within the powerful circles of influence he had infiltrated. But his success at manipulating other people made it easy for him to be arrogant, maybe even for him to see the people around him as tools to be used for his ends rather than people to be treated with loyalty and respect. Ironically, this part of Philby's character made him ideal for being used himself by Soviet intelligence: the same kind of person who would look down on the people he lives and works with him would have less of a problem betraying those people. That said, Philby's belief that he was in control and could control those around him might even have extended to some of his Soviet comrades.

For the KGB, their task is a constant battle to gain influence over people who are themselves influential, or even people who might one day be influential:


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
	Most of the activity of the department was to compile a huge amount of information on individuals who were instrumental in creating public opinion: publishers, editors, journalists, actors, educationalists, professors of political science, members of parliament, representatives of business circles. Most of these people were divided roughly in two groups. Those who would toe the Soviet foreign policy, they would be promoted to the positions of power through media and public opinion manipulation.


Traces of such an effort can be seen with President Trump well before the 2016 election. [Reports](http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/ct-trump-1996-presidential-race-20170112-story.html) of soviet-era records say the StB, who were closely associated with the KGB, kept records on Trump's first wife, Ivana, as far back as 30 years ago. Ivana would make frequent trips to Czechoslovakia without her husband. There she would visit her father, himself an StB informant, who would report on her visits to other agents. The StB gives some hints that Ivana's relationship with the StB was more developed than that of an unwitting espionage target: according to the report, Ivana was nervous for one trip, where she was supposed to meet a Czechoslovak security official, as she believed U.S. embassy staffers were following her. The StB learned from Ivana's visits that Trump was confident he could eventually run for President, which he was being pressured to do 1988, and they assessed that any mistake by Ivana could have immense consequences for him.

Trump left Ivana for his second wife, Marla Maples, in 1991, although it appears that someone [impersonating](http://people.com/celebrity/donald-trump-denies-pretending-to-be-his-publicist-in-newly-surfaced-recording/) Trump tried to create a rift in their relationship.

Other people close to Trump are worthy of scrutiny. Trump's enigmatic communications director, Hope Hicks, began her career at an [unusual](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2009/10/27/AR2009102704010.html) PR [firm](https://qz.com/954169/jared-kushners-new-head-of-communications-is-appropriately-a-veteran-of-selling-blumhouse-horror-films-like-get-out-and-the-purge/), where she worked on accounts related to Trump's hospitality ventures, before ingratiating herself with Ivanka Trump and working her way into the graces of Donald Trump. As [one journalist](https://www.gq.com/story/hope-hicks-mystifying-triumph-donald-trump) points out, Hicks had possessed qualities that would help her win-over someone like Trump since childhood.

For Obama, there are hints of an effort to influence him from childhood. Former *Daily Telegraph* editor Toby Harnden [points](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/barackobama/2601914/Frank-Marshall-Davis-alleged-Communist-was-early-influence-on-Barack-Obama.html) to Communist activist Frank Marshall Davis as a possible negative influence on Obama's early years. Contrary to Harnden's depiction, Davis was a successful and persuasive intellectual, with a gift for writing about world events. But what Davis would "teach" in his writings was indistinguishable from Russian propaganda:


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 29, 1949: Atom Bombs and Peace

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I think we have reached the point where the big question, the key question, the question which the thought control boys have decided is the test for "loyalty," has become merely so much empty rhetoric.

	Specifically, I refer to the many variations of this basic question: "Would you fight for the United States in the event of a war with Russia?"

	I say this is so much rhetoric, so many wasted words, because if there is a war between America and the Soviet Union, I, for one, will take a last fond glance at this beautiful world of ours and prepare to bid it goodbye forever. Not even life in Timbuktu could survive World War III.

	This has been removed from the realm of speculation to the real­ity of grim fact with the recent and reluctant admission by President Truman that the Soviets have the atom bomb. This means, simply, that an A-bomb cannot be dropped on Moscow or Siberia without expecting a return of the compliment at Washington, D. C., or California.

	I phrase it this way because the only talk I have heard of using such bombs came from high officials of the American Legion, former U. S. ambassadors and other top-ranking politicians. If there has been similar talk in the Kremlin, our espionage agents have not mentioned it in the daily press. Instead, the men of Moscow speak of peace—something which is officially interpreted by the White House as a "Communist plot."


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	The "sleeper" now wakened was a general called Zhang Zhizhong (whom we shall refer to as ZZZ), commander of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. In 1925 he had been a teacher at Whampoa, the Russian-funded and Russian-staffed military academy near Canton. From the day of its founding, Moscow made a determined effort to plant high-level agents in the Nationalist military.

	...on 9 August, without authorisation, ZZZ staged an incident outside Shanghai airport, where a Chinese army unit, which he himself had specially stationed there, shot dead a Japanese marine lieutenant and a private. A Chinese prisoner under sentence of death was then dressed in a Chinese uniform and shot dead at the airport gate, to make it seem that the Japanese had fired first. The Japanese gave every sign of wishing to defuse the incident, but ZZZ still bombarded Chiang with requests to launch an offensive, which Chiang vetoed. On the morning of the 13th, the Generalissimo told ZZZ not to launch a war "on impulse," but to "study and discuss" all the angles again, and then submit his plan. ZZZ pressed next day: "This army is determined to start the offensive against the enemy at 5 p.m. today Here is the plan. . ." On the 14th, Chinese planes bombed the Japanese flagship Izumo, as well as troops and navy planes on the ground, and ZZZ ordered a general offensive. But Chiang stopped him: "You must not attack this evening. Wait for order."  
 
	When no order arrived, ZZZ outflanked Chiang by issuing a press release next day; claiming, falsely; that Japanese warships had shelled Shanghai and that Japanese troops had started attacking the Chinese. With anti-Japanese feeling running high, Chiang was put on the spot. The following day; 16 August, he finally gave the order: "General assault for dawn tomorrow."
 
	But after one day's fighting, Chiang ordered a halt, on the 18th. ZZZ simply ignored the order and expanded his offensives. All-out war became unstoppable as large Japanese reinforcements began to arrive on 22 August.

	...Moscow was exhilarated by the turn of events, as the Soviet foreign minister, Maksim Litvinov, admitted to French vice-premier Leon Blum. According to Blum, Litvinov told him that "he [Litvinov] and the Soviet Union were perfectly delighted that Japan had attacked China [adding] that the Soviet Union hoped that way between China and Japan would continue just as long as possible..."


http://www.nytimes.com/2003/03/05/world/new-study-supports-idea-stalin-was-poisoned.html
	New Study Supports Idea Stalin Was Poisoned

	By MICHAEL WINES

	Fifty years after Stalin died, felled by a brain hemorrhage at his dacha, an exhaustive study of long-secret Soviet records lends new weight to an old theory that he was actually poisoned, perhaps to avert a looming war with the United States.

	That war may well have been closer than anyone outside the Kremlin suspected at the time, say the authors of a new book based on the records.
	
	...Why Stalin might have been killed is a less difficult question. Politburo members lived in fear of Stalin; beyond that, the book cites a previously secret report as evidence that Stalin was preparing to add a new dimension to the alleged American conspiracy known as the Doctors' Plot.

	That report -- an interrogation of a supposed American agent named Ivan I. Varfolomeyev, in 1951 -- indicated that the Kremlin was preparing to accuse the United States of a plot to destroy much of Moscow with a new nuclear weapon, then to launch an invasion of Soviet territory along the Chinese border.

	Mr. Varfolomeyev's fantastic plot was known in Soviet documents as "the plan of the internal blow." Stalin, the book states, had assigned the Varfolomeyev case highest priority, and was preparing to proceed with a public trial despite his underlings' fears that the charges were so unbelievable that they would make the Kremlin a global laughingstock.

	Mr. Naumov said in an interview today that that plan, combined with other Soviet military preparations in the Russian Far East at the time, strongly suggest that Stalin was preparing for a war along the United States' Pacific Coast. What remains unclear, he said, is whether he planned a first strike or whether the mushrooming conspiracy unfolding in Moscow was to serve as a provocation that would lead both sides to a flash point.

	"I am told that the only case when the two sides were on the verge of war was the Cuban crisis," in 1962, he said. "But I think this was the first case. And this first time that we were on the verge of war was even more dangerous," because the devastation of nuclear weapons was not yet an article of faith.

	Mr. Brent said he believes that fear of a nuclear holocaust could have led Beria and perhaps others at that final dinner to assent to Stalin's death.

	"No question -- they were afraid," he said. "But they knew that the direction Stalin was going in was one of fiercer and fiercer conflict with the U.S. This is what Khrushchev saw, and it is what Beria saw. And it scared them to death."

	The authors say that Stalin knew of his comrades' fears, citing as proof remarks at a December 1952 meeting of top Communist leaders in which Stalin began laying out the scope of the Doctors' Plot and the American threat to Soviet power.

	"Here, look at you -- blind men, kittens," the minutes record Stalin as saying. "You don't see the enemy. What will you do without me?"



&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books/about/Writings_of_Frank_Marshall_Davis.html
	CHURCHILL OR WALLACE WORLD?: PART II
	September 22, 1943
	Frank Marshall Davis

	...It’s not too early to consider the fate of Japan after her defeat, and whatever plans are made will have to be worked out with the full approval of China as well as Russia, her neighbors, if there’s going to be any kind of real peace. No Anglo-American alliance is going to go in and run Japan in utter disregard of the wishes of the Soviet Union and the Chinese nation without inviting eventual disaster.


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	The Soviet Union refused to sign the San Francisco peace treaty and condemned the security treaty. Its refusal to give up the four islands in the southern chain of the Kuriles north of Hokkaido (known in Japan as the ‘Northern Territories’), which it had occupied at the end of the war, made it impossible for the remainder of the century to conclude a peace treaty with Japan. A Soviet offer in 1956 to return the two southernmost islands (Shikotan and the Habomais) in return for a peace treaty on its own terms failed to break the deadlock and was later withdrawn.

	Throughout the Cold War one of the main priorities of the Tokyo residency’s active measures was to drive a wedge between Japan and the United States. Its first major opportunity came with the negotiation of a revised security treaty in January 1960. A campaign against ratification of the treaty begun by the Japanese Socialist Party (JSP), the Japanese Communist Party (JCP), the Trades Union General Council (Sohyo) and the Student Federation (Zengakuren) turned into the biggest mass movement in Japanese political history. At the height of the protest in May and June 1960, several million people in Tokyo and the main cities took part in street demonstrations and work stoppages, attended meetings and signed petitions. There were brawls in the Diet and riots in the streets, during which a female Tokyo University student was trampled to death. As usually happened with protest movements of which it approved, the KGB claimed excessive credit for it.

	...The Tokyo residency also made plans for peacetime acts of sabotage intended to damage US-Japanese relations. In Line F jargon each act of sabotage was termed a ‘lily’ (lilya), the explosive device a ‘bouquet’ (buket), the detonator a ‘little flower’ (tsvetok), the explosion of the device a ‘splash’ (zaplyv), and the saboteur the ‘gardener’ (sadovnik). Among the sabotage plans devised by Line F was operation VULKAN, an attack on the library of the American Cultural Center in Tokyo which was planned to coincide with demonstrations against the Vietnam War in October 1965. The illegal agent NOMOTO was to place a book bomb in a bookcase in the library shortly before it closed one evening, together with a detonator concealed in a pack of American cigarettes which was timed to go off in the early hours of the morning. In order to conceal the KGB’s hand in the operation, Service A was to prepare leaflets purporting to come from Japanese nationalist extremists calling for attacks on US property. The most dramatic scheme devised by Line F to cause a major crisis in US- Japanese relations was a 1969 plan to scatter radioactive material in Tokyo Bay in the expectation that it would be blamed on US nuclear submarines using the Yokosuka naval base and cause a national outcry. Though supported by the Tokyo resident, the plan was turned down by the Centre because of the difficulty of obtaining suitable radioactive material from the United States and the danger that the source of Soviet material might be detected. 18 Two years later KGB plans for ‘special actions’ were drastically scaled down after some of them were compromised by the defection in London of the Line F officer, Oleg Lyalin.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	May 18, 1950: Our New “Democratic” Partner

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I was brought up with a healthy respect for the word, democracy. And yet I have constantly found it used with the utmost cynicism on the home front; this loose usage has undoubtedly prepared the way for careless handling internationally.

	Thus we have the amazing spectacle of the foreign ministers of the United States, Great Britain and France formally, announcing that Western Germany is being brought in as a full fledged partner in the alliance of the "western democracies" against Russia.

	If there had been a sincere effort to democratize Western Germany, I would feel much better about it. But it is a known fact that many honest American officials have quit their posts in disgust over the way in which Western Germany is being handed back to the Nazis.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	The [Federal Republic of Germany] was a major target for KGB active measures as well as intelligence collection. The chief priority of both KGB and HVA influence operations during the 1950s and 1960s was to discredit as many West German politicians as possible as neo-Nazis and “revenge- seekers.”

	...The most celebrated West German target of the KGB and the HVA was Willy Brandt, codenamed POLYARNIK (“Polar”). From the moment Brandt became Bürgermeister of Berlin in October 1957, he was the victim of a series of active measures operations designed first to discredit and then to blackmail him. Given Brandt’s heroic record of resistance to Hitler, it was plainly unrealistic to include him in the KGB’s list of neo-Nazi conspirators. Instead, by distorting his early career and war record, KGB and HVA active measures sought, at various times, to portray him as a Gestapo informer, an anti-German émigré, a collaborator with SIS and the CIA and even as a former Soviet agent.

	...Brandt quickly denounced the “blind terror” waged by the Communists, on Soviet instructions, against POUM and other left-wing heretics:

		The truth of the matter is: the Comintern is determined to destroy all forces that refuse to obey its orders. It is for this reason that the whole international labor movement must rise against it.

	Brandt in turn was, absurdly, denounced by the Communists as “an agent of Franco” and “a spy of the Gestapo.”

	...After Hitler’s invasion of the Soviet Union in June 1941, Brandt’s attitude to Moscow changed. ...Some, including Brandt, were now willing to cooperate with the Soviet Union to secure the defeat of Hitler.

	...Brandt’s overriding motive was to provide any information to all three members of the Grand Alliance which might contribute to the defeat of Hitler. In the case of the Soviet Union, he calculated accurately that his best channel of communication with Moscow was via the Stockholm residency.

	The first attempt to discredit Brandt after his election as Berlin Bürgermeister in 1957 was a lengthy operation carried out jointly by the KGB and HVA in 1958-9 to use tendentious versions of his wartime record and other fabrications to show him as an agent of British and American intelligence. But, as the file on the operation acknowledges, “This did not produce the desired result, and Brandt’s position as a politician was not undermined.” Wolf next proposed reviving the old slander that Brandt had been a Gestapo agent during his Norwegian exile, but the East German leadership ordered the plan to be aborted due to lack of credible evidence.


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	...Our denazification program was one of the big jokes of the 20th century. Apparently, it was offered as a sop to an American public still outraged by the horrors of the mass tortures at Dachau and Buchenwald, of the attempt to exterminate the whole Jewish people.

	But the public has gradually forgotten in five years. And as the memory of these atrocities faded, so did our denazification. Stalin has been built up as a greater menace than Hitler and tears have been shed over the "poor Nazis" who murdered tens of millions of human beings.

	...If Germany is to become our partner, let us insist that she get the cleansing promised but never seriously undertaken.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...AMONG DEPARTMENT V’S most ambitious proposals for special actions during 1968 was an operation to distract Western opinion from the suppression of the Prague Spring by sabotaging a major oil pipeline, codenamed ZVENO (“Link”), near the Austrian end of Bodensee Lake, which was believed by the Centre to carry 10 million tons of oil a year between Italy and West Germany. By breaching the pipeline at the point where it crossed the Rhine canal, Department V calculated that it could pollute the Bodensee, and thus contaminate the main source of drinking water on the West German— Austrian frontier. To carry the explosive, the Vienna residency purchased four Western-manufactured 1-liter thermos flasks, as well as ten ballpoint pens—presumably to conceal the detonators. The scapegoats for the environmental disaster caused by the explosion were to be Italian extremists allegedly retaliating for acts of sabotage carried out by South Tyrol terrorists. ZVENO set the pattern for most Department V peacetime special actions: immensely laborious and detailed preparations, followed by a reluctant decision not to go ahead because of the political risks involved—in particular, the possibility that, despite all the precautions taken, the hand of the KGB might somehow be discovered. The operation was postponed several times, kept under review for a number of years and finally abandoned.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	January 12, 1950: Africa is Next Door

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...The empires of Western Europe are fighting as never before to retain a stranglehold on Africa. It is essential for the success of any war with Russia. Yet freedom for Africa is vital to freedom for all Asia; England, France and The Netherlands can get the wealth and raw materials to carry on warfare against liberation of their Asiatic colonies as long as they can exploit Africa. American Big Business prospers by controlling the imperialist cliques of Western Europe; the Atlantic Pact throws our armed might behind the empires as they attempt to crush independence movements within the colonies. And all of this continuation of virtual slavery is justified under the guise of a holy war to contain "Russian communism."

	...At the same time, the fire of liberation burns brighter among Africans with each success of Asiatic people to obtain self-government—thus further indicating the real closeness of Asia and Africa. And England, France, Belgium and the others are worried. So they bring out the usual cry of communism—sometimes with unexpected results.

	For instance, the 2.000,000 whites who rule South Africa have 147 members of parliament but permit only three for the 8,000,000 Negroes—and these three must be white. Last year the Negroes elected two representatives. Both are Communists. According to the Rev. R. W. Stopford, an educational leader in Africa, the natives are attracted by the fact that Russia has virtually abolished illiteracy and has ended discrimination against [sic] colored peoples.


http://www.latimes.com/world/la-fg-c1-black-russian-americans-20141119-story.html
	In Russia, early African American migrants found the good life

	...Most of the African Americans who came to Russia were seeking a better life, desperate to flee the social inequality and Depression-era hardships that racked America at the time, said Allison Blakely, professor emeritus of history at Boston University who has written a book on the African American immigrants.

	...Their ranks included graduates of historically black colleges such as Tuskegee University in Alabama and Virginia's Hampton Agricultural and Industrial School, later called the Hampton Institute. They were engineers, educators, entertainers, journalists, lawyers. The actor-activist Paul Robeson and poet Langston Hughes were among those travelers captivated by communism.

	The Soviets gave the African Americans red-carpet treatment, including fat paychecks, subsidized housing and free vacations.

	"My father felt the U.S.S.R. treated him better than America," said Tynes-Mensah, a former university chemistry instructor who was born in the Russian town of Krasnodar and now lives mainly in the United States, spending summers in Russia. "He was happy here."

	...Tynes, who was sent to various Soviet republics to teach people how to raise ducks and other waterfowl, became a nationally recognized expert on poultry. Golden helped develop a cotton industry in Uzbekistan. And the African Americans introduced Russians to blues and jazz.

	"They had an impact disproportionate to their numbers because they were there precisely because the Soviet leadership was trying to use them as a symbol of what they were trying to build in terms of a truly democratic society," Blakely said. "They were very much in the public eye."


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	During the mid- 1920s African and American blacks began to study in Moscow’s secret Comintern-run International Lenin School (MLSh) and Communist University of the Toilers of the East (KUTV). All were given false identities during their time in Moscow and their curriculum, like that of the other students, included training in underground work, espionage and guerrilla warfare. The Comintern leadership, however, had low expectations of all but the South Africans. Like other Soviet leaders, Grigori Zinoviev, the Comintern Chairman, knew little about black Africa. When he came to lecture at the KUTV in 1926, an Ashanti student from the Gold Coast, Bankole Awanoore-Renner, asked him about ‘Comintern’s attitude toward the oppressed nations of Africa’. Zinoviev responded by talking in some detail about the problems of Morocco and Tunisia, but Awanoore-Renner complained that he said nothing about ‘the most oppressed people’ south of the Sahara. Though Zinoviev pleaded lack of information, Awanoore-Renner thought he detected the stench of racism. 

	In September 1932 mounting complaints of racism in Moscow by black African and American students led Comintern’s Executive Committee to appoint an investigative committee. In January 1933 Dmitri Manuilsky, who had succeeded Zinoviev as Comintern chief, came to the University to listen to their complaints, which included a letter complaining of the ‘derogatory portrayal of Negroes in the cultural institutions of the Soviet Union’ as ‘real monkeys’. The signatures included the name ‘James Joken’, the Moscow alias of Jomo Kenyatta, later the first leader of independent Kenya. For Kenyatta, as for many radical African students a generation later, life in the Soviet Union was a disillusioning experience.

	...The Soviet Union’s closest relationships with leaders of other newly independent African states were also short lived. Moscow’s main hopes of extending its influence in sub-Saharan Africa were initially centred on Ghana, which in 1957 became the first black African state to achieve independence under the charismatic leadership of Kwame Nkrumah, widely hailed as the prototype of the new educated African statesman committed to both democracy and socialism. Once in power, however, Nkrumah’s rhetoric of liberation was rapidly contradicted by his intolerance of dissent. Though he claimed to be creating a specifically African brand of socialism rather than subscribing to Marxism-Leninism, his speeches became increasingly pro-Soviet. As he and his sycophantic supporters in the Convention People’s Party (CPP) transformed Ghana into a corrupt one-party state, Soviet and East German military, security and technical advisers arrived in increasing numbers. A KGB-trained National Security Service oversaw a huge network of informers. According to a Ghanaian white paper published after Nkrumah’s overthrow: ‘Nkrumah’s security officers, both men and women, were placed everywhere - in factories, offices, drinking bars, political rallies and even in churches, not forgetting the taxi drivers, bus drivers, shop assistants, peddlers and seemingly unemployed persons who were all acting as informants.’ 

	...The most important lesson drawn by Nkrumah from his overthrow was ‘that independent African states must pursue a policy of all-out socialism if they are to survive’. That his host in Guinea, Sékou Touré, survived in power, however, was due not to ‘all-out socialism’ but to the pervasiveness of his reign of terror which left even the army too cowed to attempt a military coup. The prisoners brought from their homes in the early hours for interrogation at Camp Boiro and other prison camps constructed with assistance from the East German Stasi and the Czechoslovak StB were tortured until they confessed to the usually imaginary conspiracies with which Sékou Touré was obsessed. The KGB turned a blind eye to the horrors of the Guinean regime, preferring instead to exploit its leader’s paranoid tendencies by active measures designed to convince him that the CIA was plotting to overthrow him.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 22, 1949: Cold War In Church

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...If civilization survives the threat of World War III, future generations will remember Dr. Melish as one of the great martyrs of 1949 in the fight against the flood-tide of American fascism. Dr. Melish is a victim, on the religious front, of a Truman administration that talks like an anger and acts like the devil. 

	The cold war policies of the bi-partisans, administered by their thought control police, are aimed against such Negroes as Paul Robeson, who think American democracy could learn about race relations from Russia


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	Among the intelligence which the Childs brothers reported to the FBI for more than twenty years were the claims of the CPUSA leadership to influence on the black civil rights movement. In 1958 Jack Childs had reported a boast by James Jackson, Party secretary in charge of “Negro and Southern Affairs,” that “most secret and guarded people” were “guiding” the civil rights leader Martin Luther King. According to one KGB file, Dobrynin, the Soviet ambassador, later asked Hall to stop bringing Jackson, whom he described as “poorly trained politically,” to meetings with him; he also requested the Soviet mission to the UN (by which he probably meant the KGB New York residency) to break off contact with Jackson.

	There was, however, some substance to the claim that the CPUSA had penetrated King’s entourage. The Childs brothers reported that one of King’s advisers, Stanley D. Levison, a New York lawyer and entrepreneur, was a secret Party member. 77 Levison drafted sections of King’s 1958 book, Stride Toward Freedom, and helped prepare his defense against trumped-up charges of perjury on his Alabama tax returns in 1960. Levison also introduced into King’s entourage a secret black member of the CPUSA, Hunter Pitts “Jack” O’Dell. The FBI, who put Levison under surveillance, reported that he was meeting Viktor Lesiovsky, a KGB officer working as special assistant to the UN Secretary-General, U Thant. It was Levison’s alleged influence on King which in 1963 led Attorney-General Robert Kennedy to authorize the bugging of King’s hotel rooms. Though the bugs produced recordings of a number of King’s sexual liaisons, in which President Lyndon B. Johnson took a prurient interest, they provided no evidence of Communist influence on him.

	...By the mid-1960s the claims by the CPUSA leadership that secret Party members within King’s entourage would be able to “guide” his policies had proved to be hollow. To the Centre’s dismay, King repeatedly linked the aims of the civil rights movement not to the alleged worldwide struggle against American imperialism but to the fulfillment of the American dream and “the magnificent words of the Constitution and the Declaration of Independence.”

	...Having given up hope of influencing King, the Centre aimed instead at replacing him with a more radical and malleable leader. In August 1967 the Centre approved an operational plan by the deputy head of Service A, Yuri Modin, former controller of the Magnificent Five, to discredit King and his chief lieutenants by placing articles in the African press, which could then be reprinted in American newspapers, portraying King as an “Uncle Tom” who was secretly receiving government subsidies to tame the civil rights movement.

	...The same operational plan also contained a series of active measures designed to discredit US policy “on the Negro issue.” The Centre authorized Modin ...To forge and distribute through illegal channels a document showing that the John Birch Society, in conjunction with the Minuteman organization, is developing a plan for the physical elimination of leading figures in the Negro movement in the US.

	...Service A sought to exploit the violent images of the long, hot summers which began in August 1965 with race riots in Watts, the black Los Angeles ghetto, which resulted in thirty-six deaths, left 1,032 injured and caused damage estimated at over 40 million dollars. The Centre seems to have hoped that as violence intensified King would be swept aside by black radicals such as Stokeley Carmichael, who told a meeting of Third World revolutionaries in Cuba in the summer of 1967, “We have a common enemy. Our struggle is to overthrow this system ... We are moving into open guerrilla warfare in the United States.”

	...King’s assassination on April 4, 1968 was quickly followed by the violence and rioting which the KGB had earlier blamed King for trying to prevent. Within a week riots had erupted in over a hundred cities, forty-six people had been killed, 3,500 injured and 20,000 arrested. To “Deke” DeLoach, it seemed that, “The nation was teetering on the brink of anarchy.” Henceforth, instead of dismissing King as an Uncle Tom, Service A portrayed him as a martyr of the black liberation movement and spread conspiracy theories alleging that his murder had been planned by white racists with the connivance of the authorities.

	...Simultaneously the Centre implemented a series of active measures designed to weaken the internal cohesion of the United States and undermine its international reputation by inciting race hatred. In 1971 Andropov personally approved the fabrication of pamphlets full of racist insults purporting to come from the extremist Jewish Defense League, headed by Meir Kahane, calling for a campaign against the “black mongrels” who, it was claimed, were attacking Jews and looting Jewish shops. Thirty pamphlets were mailed to a series of militant black groups in the hope of producing “mass disorders in New York.” At the same time forged letters were sent to sixty black organizations giving fictitious details of atrocities committed by the League against blacks and calling for vengeance against Kahane and his chief lieutenants.

	...On at least one occasion, the Centre ordered the use of explosives to exacerbate racial tensions in New York. On July 25, 1971 the head of the FCD First (North American) Department, Anatoli Tikhonovich Kireyev, instructed the New York residency to proceed with operation PANDORA: the planting of a delayed-action explosive package in “the Negro section of New York.” Kireyev’s preferred target was “one of the Negro colleges.” After the explosion the residency was ordered to make anonymous telephone calls to two or three black organizations, claiming that the explosion was the work of the Jewish Defense League.


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2013/03/how-stalin-created-some-of-the-post-soviet-worlds-worst-ethnic-conflicts/273649/
	How Stalin Created Some of the Post-Soviet World's Worst Ethnic Conflicts

	Eighty-one-year-old Nikolai Khasig was born in Sukhumi in 1932. It was just one year after Soviet dictator Josef Stalin stripped Abkhazia of its short-lived status as a full-fledged republic of the USSR and made it a region of Soviet Georgia.

	At the end of 1936, Lavrenty Beria -- at that time the head of the Transcaucasia region and later the sadistic head of Stalin's secret police -- invited the popular Abkhaz leader Nestor Lakoba to dinner at his house in Tbilisi. Lakoba died suddenly -- officially, of a heart attack, but it was widely believed that the former revolutionary comrade of Stalin's had been poisoned.

	In the repressions that began in 1937, the entire Abkhaz government was arrested and subjected to show trials. Soviet archives later revealed that Beria had ordered them all executed before the trials even began. Collectivization came to Abkhazia with a vengeance. Soviet publications began arguing that the Abkhaz were actually of Georgian origin in the first place.

	"Such violence, such humiliation, such abuse, such genocide," Khasig recalls. "Our people never experienced such things before."

	..."In 1945, after the end of the war, Abkhaz schools were shut down and the policy of forced assimilation was begun," he says. "Our children -- we ourselves -- studied in the Georgian language and didn't know a single word [of Abkhaz]. We were simply cut off."

	When the Soviet Union collapsed in 1991, all this old resentment and more surged to the surface.

	In 1992, war broke out in Abkhazia -- with Abkhaz separatists joined in their struggle by representatives of other aggrieved Caucasus nations such as Chechens, Circassians, Ossetians, and Cossacks.

	The Abkhaz were also actively supported by the Russian military. An estimated 8,000 people were killed and as many as 240,000 ethnic Georgians were displaced.

	...The guns of war flared elsewhere as well in the former Soviet Union in the early 1990s. And these similar ethnic conflicts, many of which were exacerbated by Soviet polices six decades earlier, have come to be called "Stalin's time bombs."

	Such conflicts, spanning from Central Europe to the intricate patchwork of exclaves that comprises the borders of Central Asia, are in many ways direct legacies of the shifting nationalities policies that were often brutally implemented during the nearly 30 years that Stalin towered over the Soviet Union.

	These disputed places include the disputed ethnic-Armenian region of Azerbaijan called Nagorno-Karabakh, Russia's North Caucasus republic of Chechnya, its neighboring republics, and the breakaway Moldovan region of Transdniester.

	From bizarre border policies and the wholesale deportation of ethnic groups to the mass importation of ethnic Russians to various regions, Stalin's policies created or aggravated conflicts that remain central to understanding Eurasia today. 


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	After the liberation of Ukraine, he returned with the Institute to Kharkov. His memories of the brutal punishment of many thousands of ‘anti-Soviet’ Ukrainians sometimes gave him nightmares in later life.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-europe-25058256
	But the pain of the Holodomor comes not only from the unfathomable number of dead. Many people believe the causes were man-made and intentional. A genocide.

	They say that Joseph Stalin wanted to starve into submission the rebellious Ukrainian peasantry and force them into collective farms.

	The Kremlin requisitioned more grain than farmers could provide. When they resisted, brigades of Communist Party activists swept through the villages and took everything that was edible.

	"The brigades took all the wheat, barley - everything - so we had nothing left," says Ms Karpenko. "Even beans that people had set aside just in case.

	"The brigades crawled everywhere and took everything. People had nothing left to do but die."

	Genocide row

	As the hunger mounted, Soviet authorities took extra measures, such as closing off Ukraine's borders, so that peasants could not travel abroad and obtain food. This amounted to a death sentence, experts say.

	"The government did everything it could to prevent peasants from entering other regions and looking for bread," says Oleksandra Monetova, from Kiev's Holodomor Memorial Museum. 

	...Mr Baley, an American composer who was born in Ukraine, supports efforts to have the Holodomor recognised internationally as genocide.

	"You have to admit that it was done, if you want to have any kind of human progress," he says. "You can't wrap it up and say that it wasn't."


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 29, 1949: Challenge to the Church

	Frank Marshall Davis

	..."Whatever your differences and mine may be with Soviet Russia, we must recognize the difference between the Communist attack on religion and the fascist attack. The Communist attack is intellectual, philosophical, critical and harmless, practically speaking."


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...As well as giving higher priority to operations against the Vatican, Andropov also stepped up the persecution of the Ukrainian Uniates. In 1969 the head of the underground church, Bishop Velychkovsky, was arrested and sentenced to three years’ imprisonment. The KGB reported that his arrest “greatly helped to achieve a psychological breakthrough in the mind of SERAFIM,” another leading figure in the Uniate underground, who was recruited as a KGB agent. According to Mitrokhin’s notes on his file:

		SERAFIM explained in detail by whom, when and in what circumstances he was tasked to direct monks illegally; he reported incidents of criminal organizational activity by Bishop Velychkovsky and his close contacts; he reported on the situation among underground orders of monks . . . and he drew up a list of Uniate priests operating illegally. SERAFIM’S answers were recorded covertly on tape.

	Though SERAFIM agreed to “cooperate secretly” with the KGB, he refused to sign the written undertaking required of most informers. His controller did not insist, on the grounds that it would represent too great “a psychological trial for a man of religion” and leave him in fear of “divine punishment in the next world.” Another agent, terrified of “being cast into Hell,” had once begged the controller, on bended knee, to return his signed undertaking.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books/about/Writings_of_Frank_Marshall_Davis.html
	BEN AND THE REDS
	September 17, 1943
	Frank Marshall Davis

	Maybe we ought to get more savvy about the Communists anyway. A social system that can mold Russia from a huge weakling in twenty-five years to what is today the strongest and most united nation in Europe, a people who has borne the full brunt of the terrible Nazi war machine and has flung it back, must have something, fundamentally sound.

	You have probably noticed here at home that practically every social advance made under the Roosevelt regime has been labeled “Red.” You may have noticed also that practically everybody who yells, “Communist” is him-self anti-Negro or anti-labor


http://www.cnn.com/2016/03/30/us/black-privilege/index.html
	...David Horowitz, author of the book, "Black Skin Privilege and the American Dream," says blacks are still more privileged, though they lag behind other racial groups in varying categories. It's not white privilege that's preventing them from doing better, he says; it's their behavior, such as their inability to build more intact families.

	"The fact that white people are better off is not a privilege; it's earned," says Horowitz, founder of the David Horowitz Freedom Center, a think tank in Los Angeles created to combat "the efforts of the radical left and its Islamist allies to destroy American values."


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	April 6, 1950: Bridges Conviction

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I am not at all surprised at the conviction of Harry Bridges. Disappointed, yes, but not surprised. With the political atmosphere prevailing in my country today, I believe that President Truman or even Alfred Sloan of General Motors would be convicted of being Soviet spies if a way could be found to bring them to trial. And if Senator McCarthy keeps up his attacks, even that might happen.

	From the accounts in the local daily press, Judge Harris gave a surprisingly fair charge to the jury. In this, he partially redeemed himself for certain earlier tactics which put the whole defense in a bad light. But by the time the court charged the jury, the real damage had already been done. The one bright spot is that the jurors deliberated from Friday until Tuesday before reaching a verdict. Even the growing roar of the witch-hunters did not intimidate them into a speedy decision of guilt. In calmer times, I believe they would have freed Bridges


https://books.google.com/books?id=8TXhy5pl2A0C&pg=PA224
	In four different federal hearings, Bridges denied under oath that he wa a member of the CPUSA. In the files of the Comintern in Moscow, we found a list of CPUSA members elected to the Central Committee of the party in 1936; on that list is a Comrade Rossi, identified in an accompanying biography as the pseudonym of Harry Bridges.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IB_ShD9fTcsC&pg=PA47
	Another former Communist, Sam Diner, told the FBI that Eisler had acted in concert with Harry Bridges to stir up dock workers in the San Francisco strike of 1934 that paralyed the city.


http://www.sfgate.com/bayarea/article/Soviet-Spies-Cast-a-Wide-Net-in-S-F-Decoded-2973582.php
	Soviet Spies Cast a Wide Net in S.F. / Decoded messages reveal activities of KGB in the '40s

	...The messages, distributed last week by the NSA's Center for Cryptologic History, were coded by Soviet agents and telegraphed from San Francisco, Mexico City, New York and Washington to Moscow and vice versa.

	...Among the illegal activities in the Bay Area that Soviet agents engaged in were kidnapping Russians hiding here and sending them back to the Soviet Union, where they faced certain death; receiving and assisting clandestine Russian agents with faked American identities; spying on American officials; and recruiting Communists in California for intelligence work.

	...Another local figure who appears in the telegraph traffic, although the reference is fragmentary and unclear, is Harry Bridges, the longtime pro-Soviet head of the International Longshoremen's and Warehousemen's Union. 


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/Venona-San%20Francisco-KGB.pdf
	San Francisco KGB Station -- Moscow Center Cables, 1943-46
	From: SAN FRANCISCO
	To: MOSCOW

	...Harry BRIDGES asked...

	...and William MACKEY[MAKKEJ], who is working on the loading of our  ships in PORTLAND under “UNCLE[DYaDYa].  [1 group unrecovered] “VITALIJ”[v]  for processing [OFORMLENIE] these people...


https://books.google.com/books?id=BabHjAEzkdwC&pg=PA311	
	By Frank Marshall Davis

	...I also wrote to Harry Bridges, head of the ILWU, whom I had met at Lincoln School. He suggested I get in touch with Koji Ariyoshi, editor of the Honoulu Record, a newspaper that was generally similar to the Chicago Star.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ZqtEIBxAhMsC&pg=PA177
	...Davis was the editor until 1948 ...The editorial column "Frank-ly Speaking" began at The Chicago Star. The aim of this publication was to heal the rift between various groups and promote a policy of cooperation and unity between Russia and the United States.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	June 15, 1950: The Master Plot

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...The New York trials of the 11 Communist leaders, the Harry Bridges trial, the contempt action against the Hawaii 36 are but steps in a definite program which could mean jail within two years for those who dare to read progressive publications, and this includes the HONOLULU RECORD. The plotters are banking on the continued disinterest of the American public in their master drive to kill off all independent and progressive thought within our nation.

	It is a matter of public record that on Thursday, January 12, this year, one Raymond P. Whearty, acting assistant attorney general, revealed to the House Subcommittee on Appropriations that the Department of Justice is planning the arrest and trial of 21,105 persons who — now get this — appear to be acting in concert with Russian interests." This program, Whearty said, is expected to "come up about the fiscal year 1951."

	...To Get Non-Conformists

	"The bulk of the cases involve subversive activity as applied to individuals or organizations. By that I mean persons who are active members of the Communist party and similar organizations, or who appear to be acting in concert with Russian interests." 

	This should be plain enough for all to see. By the justice department's own admission, they are not after Communists only but anybody who happens to object to the policies at the moment of those in power. That would mean anybody who spoke for peace or who opposed the Atlantic Pact or who asked for a raise in pay. This could be interpreted as "appearing to act in concert with Russian interests." They plan to do this even without the passage of the Mundt-Ferguson bill.

	And if they can make charges stick against the 21,105 victims, then they will mop up on anybody else who has not been intimidated and who insists on the traditional right to express an opinion contrary to those sanctioned by the thought police. In other words, you! This timetable for American fascism can be destroyed if the people throw off their indifference and decide they will permit no further infringement upon their democratic rights as Americans. Let the people speak!


http://www.businessinsider.com/here-was-the-fbis-secret-plan-in-case-nuclear-war-broke-out-2015-1
	The United States government made extreme, top-secret plans for preserving national security in the event of a nuclear attack during the Cold War, according to documents recently released to transparency journalism organization MuckRock.
 
	The FBI created "Plan C" in 1956, the same year the Red Army shut down the Hungarian Revolution, and if activated, Plan C would have put the nation under martial law and allowed for nearly 13,000 people to be detained for having links to "subversive organizations."
 
	The FBI held a briefing with three top officials from every department to distribute papers outlining Plan C, which was later given to FBI field offices. The plan was ordered to be destroyed in July 1957.
 
	Although the plan was never released, MuckRock's memos from closed meetings with high-ranking officials give readers an idea of what could have happened. Plan C would have gone into effect "after a war has begun in which the U.S. is involved or may become involved and prior to an actual attack on the U.S. itself," according to the documents.
 
	Government organizations would decide which of their employees were essential and have them hide out in backup offices. Soviet embassies would be searched for weapons, radios and explosives. Up to 900 Soviet diplomats and couriers would be taken into custody.
 
	In an emergency, the government would also have activated a detention program that would have led to arrests for "individuals whose affiliations with subversive organizations are so pronounced that their continued liberty in the event of national emergency would present a serious threat," according to the documents.


https://spectator.org/34799_dreams-frank-marshall-davis/
	...the FBI placed [Frank Marshall Davis] on the federal government’s Security Index, which meant that he could be immediately detained or arrested in the event of a national emergency, such as a war between the United States and USSR.


Davis used his talent for writing to help cover for the Soviet's crimes. He consistently advocated Soviet foreign policy over American foreign policy, and painted Russia as a superior country to his own. At the same time, many of the people who Davis associated with were affiliated with Soviet intelligence, and what is known about his Communist Party activities seemed awfully close to espionage:


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	Zarubin’s recruitment strategy was simple and straightforward. He demanded that the leaders of the Communist Party of the United States (CPUSA) identify supporters and sympathizers in government establishments suitable for work as agents. When Zarubin arrived in New York, the CPUSA leader Earl Browder (codenamed RULEVOY—“Helmsman”) was serving a prison sentence for using a false passport during his frequent secret journeys to the Soviet Union. His first contact was therefore with Eugene Dennis (born Francis X. Waldron, codenamed RYAN), a Moscow-trained Comintern agent who later succeeded Browder as CPUSA general secretary. Dennis reported that a number of Communists (mostly secret Party members) were joining the first professional American foreign intelligence agency, the Office of the Coordinator of Information, reorganized in June 1942 as the Office of Strategic Services (OSS). Shortly before the foundation of OSS, Browder left prison to resume the Party leadership. He was, Dennis told Moscow, “in a splendid mood.”

	Among the first Soviet agents to penetrate OSS was Duncan Chaplin Lee (codenamed KOCH), who became personal assistant to its head, General “Wild Bill” Donovan. Donovan had a relaxed attitude to the recruitment of Communists. “I’d put Stalin on the OSS payroll,” he once said, “if I thought it would help us defeat Hitler.” Throughout the Second World War the NKVD knew vastly more about OSS than OSS knew about the NKVD.

	Browder’s recruitment leads also included foreign Communists and fellow travelers who had taken refuge in the United States.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20001#page/n11/mode/2up
	...According to [REDACTED], [FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS] was working with [REDACTED] in obtaining recruits for the Communist Party among International Workers Order members


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...Though most of his sources must have been aware of the ultimate destination of their intelligence, the network was run under what Akhmerov termed “the Communist Party flag.” Informants regarded themselves as helping the CPUSA, which would in turn assist its Soviet comrades.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	Mr. DAVIS has signed a number of statements in behalf of Communists under the sponsorship of the Civil Rights Congress. One of these defended was GERHART EISLER, notorious Communist international agent who escaped jailing for passport fraud by fleeing to the Soviet sector of Germany.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Gerhart_Eisler.htm
	...Gerhart Eisler eventually got a new job at the Soviet embassy in Berlin. His official job was as a political analyst but he had actually been recruited as a spy.

	...Joseph Stalin ordered Eisler to Moscow...


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...The CPUSA’s assistance in the operation to assassinate Trotsky, combined with the enthusiasm with which it “exposed and weeded out spies and traitors,” appeared to make its underground section a reliable recruiting ground.

	Vasili Zarubin’s regular contacts with the CPUSA leader, Earl Browder, plainly convinced him of the reliability of those covert Party members who agreed to provide secret intelligence.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n13/mode/2up
	[REDACTED] stated that they also discussed deportation proceedings against Mrs. EARL BROWDER and DAVIS agreed to write a letter to President ROOSEVELT on behalf of Mrs. BROWDER. EARL BROWDER, husband of Mrs. BROWDER, was former general secretary of the Communist Party in the United States until 1945.


http://spartacus-educational.com/USAbrowder.htm
	"Browder had been an eager and productive participant in a range of Soviet espionage efforts during the 1930s... recruiting from his 'open' Communist cadres a significant number of those who later became prominent NKVD agents and sources within the American government." Browder's second wife, Raissa Berkman, was also an agent." 


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20001#page/n11/mode/2up
	In his letter to President ROOSEVELT, DAVIS was quoted as saying the following:

		"Because I am also a member of the minority group, I cannot help but feel the injustice of the persecution heaped by Attorney General BIDDLE on Mrs. EARL BROWDER, who faces deportation because of a mere technicality.

		"Mrs. BROWDER committed no crime. She is not a dangerous alien. There is no evidence she has ever actively participated in American politics. She is the mother of three children, who are at least as American as any other.

		"But she is the wife of the General Secretary of the Communist Party. This means she is married to a man who places winning the war against Fascism and complete unity among all people above any and all considerations. Does this, therefore, make Mrs. BROWDER unfit to live in our great nation?"


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n13/mode/2up
	In June, 1966, Confidential Informant [REDACTED] stated that FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS was one of numerous guests to be invited to a cocktail party for EARL BROWDER in the apartment of [REDACTED] Chicago in the near future. 


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	By the spring of 1943, however, the Centre was worried about the security of its large and expanding American agent network. Zarubin became increasingly incautious both in his meetings with Party leaders and in arranging for the payment to them of secret subsidies from Moscow. One of the files noted by Mitrokhin records censoriously, “Without the approval of the Central Committee, Zarubin crudely violated the rules of clandestinity.”.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20002#page/n37/mode/2up
	[REDACTED], in an attempt to interest an informant in joining the Communist Party, told him that if he ever needed any money to get in touch with FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS. [REDACTED] said DAVIS has financially helped him and others.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	[REDACTED], a former linotype operator for the Honolulu Record Publishing Company, Ltd, from 1949 to August 1953, advised SA's HAROLD L. CHILD, Jr., and the writer on September 9, 1953, that he was acquainted with [FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS] since the early 1930's when subject was editor of the "Atlanta Daily" at Atlanta, Georgia. he stated he later met subject in Honolulu and was rather surprised to find that subject had remarried and was living in rather luxurious fashion in contrast to his early modest existence. Subject confidentially informed him that his wife, [REDCTED] had [REDACTED] and was to [REDACTED] representing the [REDACTED] in 1954 when she reaches the age of thirty.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	On one occasion Browder asked Zarubin to deliver Soviet money personally to the Communist underground organization in Chicago; the implication in the KGB file is that he agreed. On another occasion, in April 1943, Zarubin traveled to California for a secret meeting with Steve Nelson, who ran a secret control commission to seek out informants and spies in the Californian branch of the Communist Party, but failed to find Nelson’s home. Only on a second visit did he succeed in delivering the money. On this occasion, however, the meeting was bugged by the FBI which had placed listening devices in Nelson’s home.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Gerhart_Eisler.htm
	Arrest of Gerhart Eisler 

	...Real interest in Eisler had picked up in 1943 as a result of another, entirely separate investigation in which the FBI overheard important conversations in San Francisco between an American Communist and a Soviet vice-consul. Steve Nelson, the American, told Soviet Vice-Consul Gregory Kheiffets about his efforts to recruit scientists at the Manhattan Project, and also spoke of the dissolution of the Comintern.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	...[DAVIS] was listed by the magazine 'PM' as a signatory to a petition ... calling upon President TRUMAN to effect the immediate release of Communist GERHEART EISLER.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	The Soviet ambassador in Washington was told confidentially by none other than Roosevelt’s adviser, Harry Hopkins, that a member of his embassy had been detected passing money to a Communist in California.

	...Though Zarubin became somewhat more discreet after this “friendly warning,” his cover had been blown. Worse was yet to come. Four months later Zarubin was secretly denounced to the FBI by Vasili Mironov, a senior officer in the New York residency who had earlier appealed unsuccessfully to the Centre for Zarubin’s recall. 5 In an extraordinary anonymous letter to Hoover on August 7, 1943, Mironov identified Zarubin and ten other leading members of residencies operating under diplomatic cover in the United States, himself included, as Soviet intelligence officers. He also revealed that Browder was closely involved with Soviet espionage and identified the Hollywood producer Boris Morros (FROST) as a Soviet agent. Mironov’s motives derived partly from personal loathing for Zarubin himself. He told Hoover, speaking of himself in the third person, that Zarubin and Mironov “both hate each other.” Mironov also appears to have been tortured by a sense of guilt for his part in the NKVD’s massacre of the Polish officer corps in 1940. Zarubin, he told Hoover, “interrogated and shot Poles in Kozelsk, Mironov in Starobelsk.”

	...With his cover blown, however, Zarubin found life in Washington difficult. One of his most humiliating moments came at a dinner for members of the Soviet embassy given early in 1944 by the governor of Louisiana, Sam Houston Jones. After dinner, as guests wandered round the governor’s house in small groups, a lady who appeared to know that Zarubin was a senior NKGB officer, turned to him and said, “Have a seat, General!” Zarubin, whose fuse and sense of humor were both somewhat short, took the seat but replied stiffly, “I am not a general!” Another guest, who identified himself as an officer in military intelligence, complimented the lady on her inside knowledge. He then caused Zarubin further embarrassment by asking for his views on the massacre of 16,000 Polish officers, some of whose bodies had been exhumed in the Katyn woods. Zarubin replied that German allegations that the officers had been shot by the NKVD (as indeed they had) were a provocation intended to sow dissension within the Grand Alliance which would deceive only the naive.

	Zarubin subsequently sought to persuade the Centre that his humiliating loss of cover was due not to his own indiscretion but to the fact that the Americans had somehow discovered that he had interrogated imprisoned Polish officers in Kozelsk. The Centre was unimpressed.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...THE REMOVAL FROM power by 1948 of all those Western Communist parties which had taken part in post- war coalitions reduced, but did not end, their ability to assist Soviet intelligence penetration of government bureaucracies. By far the biggest disappointment experienced by the Centre at the beginning of the Cold War in its relations with fraternal parties in the West, however, was the dramatic decline in the assistance offered by the Communist Party of the United States (CPUSA). From the mid-1930s to the onset of the Cold War, Communism had been a major force in the American labor movement, a significant influence on the liberal wing of the Democratic Party and a rite of passage for several hundred thousand young radicals. During the Second World War the Party had played an important part in assisting Soviet penetration of the Roosevelt administration, the MANHATTAN project and the intelligence community. The onset of the Cold War, however, dealt the CPUSA a blow from which it never fully recovered.

	In 1949 Gene Dennis, the general secretary, and ten other Party leaders were put on trial for advocating the forcible overthrow of the federal government. Dennis and nine of the defendants were sentenced to five years in jail, the eleventh was jailed for three years and all the defense attorneys were found in contempt of court. After the Supreme Court upheld the sentences in 1951, more than a hundred other leading Communists were convicted on similar charges. For most of the 1950s the Party was forced into a largely underground existence.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n35/mode/2up
	"I, [REDACTED], am going to make the following voluntary statement to LEO S. BRENNEISEN, known to me as a Special Agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I am willing to appear in court and testify to the following facts to be cross-examined by Counsel and faced by FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS.

	"I believe it was in 1949 in Honolulu, T. H. when I first met FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS at a social function sponsored by the Hawaii Civil Liberties Committee. I had previously joined the Communist Party in San Francisco in 1946 and transferred my membership in January, 1947 to the Communist Party of Hawaii. In 1950 after the Communist Party had conducted a series of control interviews, [REDACTED], known to me as a Communist Party Organizer, told me that the Party was being reorganized and was going underground. [REDACTED] explained to me that the Party was being broken down into "Groups of 3's" and that I was being made chairman of Group #6 and in addition given the assignment of being contact man for my own group and four other groups. [REDACTED] advised me that Chairman of Group #10 was FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS and I was to contact him at DAVIS' office, then maintained in a building of the Crown Transfer Company in the Damon Tract near the Airport.

	"Later in the fall of 1950, I started contacting FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS in connection with Communist Party matters, and relaying to him information received from my superior contact in he Communist Party, either [REDACTED] or [REDACTED].

	"During a portion of 1950, 1951, and part of 1952, I continued contacting FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS and also transmitted dues for the Communist Party received from him to my contact above. During the period of my contact with FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS, he advised me that his wife, [REDACTED], was a member of Group #10. I was never advised of the identity of a third of that group, or the fact that there was a third member in the group. During a portion of 1951, [REDACteD] took over contacts with the DAVIS group but I resumed contacting DAVIS in 1952 and continued meeting him on Communist Party matters until I left the Party in June of that year.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...It was deeply ironic that when McCarthyism was at its height the CPUSA was among those Western parties which were least able to give assistance to Soviet espionage. Not till the Supreme Court backed away from its earlier decision in 1957 was the CPUSA able to regroup. By the time the Party had drawn up a new membership list in 1958, there were only 3,000 open members and a much smaller number of undeclared members left.

	...The normal procedure was for the Centre to send a coded message to a CPUSA radio operator in New York containing details of the next transmission of funds. The message would then be passed to Jack Childs, who would decode it and inform his brother, Gus Hall (leader of the CPUSA from 1959 and codenamed PALM), or Hall’s wife Elizabeth that the next delivery was imminent.

	From 1968 the CPUSA radio operator who passed messages from the Centre on to Jack Childs was another undeclared party member of Russian descent, Albert Friedman, codenamed FORD, who worked as a salesman in a Manhattan radio store on East 49th Street. Using the alias Weber, Friedman had worked between the wars at Comintern’s radio school in Moscow, training other underground radio operators. In January 1969 he travelled to Moscow for further training, but performed so well that his instructor told him, “You know more than I do” and invited him to lunch. Though Friedman paid Party dues, his membership of the CPUSA was known only to the KGB and a small group within the Party leadership. What neither the KGB nor CPUSA leaders knew, however, was that since the end of the Second World War Friedman had been an FBI agent in the Party, codenamed CLIP. He passed every word of the Centre’s communications on to the Bureau.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20011#page/n9/mode/2up
	On July 16, 1956, Confidential Informant [REDACTED], contact with whom has not been sufficient to determine his reliability  but who has admitted membership in the Communist Party from the early 1940's to 1950 or 1951, reported that he was acquainted with DAVIS. [REDACTED] advised he knew of no recent Communist Party activity on the part of DAVIS and was of the opinion the Communist Party In Hawaii was dead. 

	On November 1, 1956, Confidential Informant [REDACTED], who has furnished reliable information in the past, reported he knew of no Communist Party activity on the part of DAVIS in recent months other than his writings in the "Honolulu Record". 

	It is to be noted that the "National Guardian", published weekly by the Weekly Guardian Associates, Inc., New York City, New York, dated October 1, 1956, on page 9 carried a statement by EUGENE DENNIS, CP USA functionary, to the effect that the U. S. Communist Party had no members In Hawaii or Alaska unless they be someone there on vacation.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20011_djvu.txt
	...November 27, 1957

	...Informant, who has been familiar with some phases of Communist Party front activity, reported he had no information of any recent Communist Party or Communist Party front activity on the part of subject; however, informant related that he does not believe DAVIS has changed any of his basic political concepts.

	Informant pointed out that in a conversation with DAVIS during the first week of November he had pointed out to DAVIS Khrushchev's statement appearing in local newspapers to the effect that the United States would be crushed in the event of war with Russia. Informant stated that DAVIS declared that Russia wants peace, but when he questioned him as to how he could account for Russia's effort to plaint seeds of dissension in non-Communist countries, DAVIS remarked that Russia feels from experience that socialism is the best way of life for people and that she will, therefore, do everything to help bring it about wherever possible. Informant stated that during this conversation DAVIS answered him in the affirmative when he questioned him if he believed in the dictatorship of the proletariat. Informant related that he pointed out that such a theory had not worked out in Russia but dictatorship had resulted. DAVIS answered by stating that socialism cannot be expected to take the same form in every country, but that the customs and traditions of each country must be considered. DAVIS went on to declare that whatever form it did take in this country, the socialist countries would be standing by to assist. 


It's important to understand that many members of Soviet intelligence didn't actually believe in communism, particularly their leadership. The brutality of the Lenin and Stalin regimes and the deliberate famines in China and Ukraine are evidence of this--if the Soviet's principle interest was for Communism to succeed abroad, it's hard to justify what amounted to deliberate sabotage of Communism at home. Accordingly, there was a wave of Russian spies and propagandists who "renounced" Communism starting in the 1950's and intensifying in the Reagan era--including [Whittaker Chambers](https://books.google.com/books?id=wVndU5P4V-8C&pg=PT163&lpg=PT163), [Hede Massing](https://books.google.com/books?id=g3LtFS3rl9MC&pg=PA241), [Samuel Dickstein](https://cityroom.blogs.nytimes.com/2013/05/22/a-street-named-for-a-soviet-spy-goes-largely-unnoticed/), [David Horowitz](https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/isr/vol28/no04/horowitz.htm), [Michael Savage](https://web.archive.org/web/20030801234541/http://www.bayarea.com/mld/mercurynews/entertainment/television/6336570.htm), [Viktor Orban](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/europe/hungary/11499564/Viktor-Orban-denies-being-communist-informer-during-days-of-one-party-state-in-Hungary.html), [James Burnham](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/James_Burnham), and even [James Comey](https://www.newyorker.com/news/news-desk/james-comeys-intellectual-history)--many of whom went on to echo the kind of Russian propaganda we are familiar with today.

It's no surprise then that Soviet intelligence so blatantly used organizations like the CPUSA as a front for espionage activities, even as these activities gradually discredited the Party and Communism more broadly. Just as the Tsarist Okhrana exploited anarchism to destabilize the countries they opposed, Communism served Soviet intelligence as an excuse for violent revolutions and a cover for espionage--a means to an end rather than the end itself.


------------


There's also something off with the town Obama's mother, Stanley Ann Dunham, was raised in, although it's been hard for me to focus and I haven't been able to finish looking into that and writing something up (some notes here: https://pastebin.com/gdh1z70f , here: https://pastebin.com/M9rPP9Fv and here: https://pastebin.com/5M6F9Qqs). It looks like Soviet illegals tried to concentrate a lot of people in one area and build up a kind of community there, and there were some communist intrigues in her high-school and the church she went to.

John Stenhouse, the president of the church and on the board of directors of the high-school, was also investigated by the FBI for ties to the Soviets and joined the communist party while he was working in the Department of Commerce (the HUAC quizzed him on his FBI investigation here: http://depts.washington.edu/labhist/cpproject/images/hearings/HUAC/Seattle-HUAC%201955%20Part%202.pdf
). It's interesting that Kincaid mentions that Stenhouse was dragged in front of the HUAC but not that the FBI investigated him, which I think says something about both Kincaid and the HUAC.

Anyway, the intersection of communism and Soviet agents with the early lives of Obama and Stanley Ann Dunham are interesting and worth looking into to get an understanding of how Russian intelligence operates and what on earth Obama was doing around the 2016 election (or the rest of his presidency for that matter). From everything I've seen so far, I can say that Russian intelligence is really, really obsessed with influence people, and one should not be surprised if they try to influence someone as important as the U.S. president or even meddle in a U.S. election to install someone they believe they have influence over. As far as I can tell, this is what happened with Trump and with Obama, too. 